Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1582.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 301.1(a.1) and (f)(12), 303(d) and 311(2) of the act of December 31, 1965 (P.L.1257, No.511), known as The Local Tax Enabling Act, are amended to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 301.1. Delegation of Taxing Powers and Restrictions Thereon.--* * *[(a.1) (1) A local taxing authority may levy a tax on the privilege of doing business in the jurisdiction of the local taxing authority if:(i) the privilege is exercised by conducting transactions in the jurisdiction of the levying local taxing authority for all or part of fifteen or more calendar days within the calendar year; or(ii) the privilege is exercised through a base of operations in the jurisdiction of the levying local taxing authority. The gross receipts subject to this tax shall not include any receipts subject to a tax measured by such gross receipts which is imposed under subparagraph (i).(2) As used in this subsection, the term "base of operations" shall mean an actual, physical and permanent place of business from which a taxpayer manages, directs and controls its business activities at that location.]* * *(f) Such local authorities shall not have authority by virtue of this act:* * *(12) To levy, assess and collect a mercantile or business privilege tax on gross receipts. [or part thereof which are: (i) discounts allowed to purchasers as cash discounts for prompt payment of their bills; (ii) charges advanced by a seller for freight, delivery or other transportation for the purchaser in accordance with the terms of a contract of sale; (iii) received upon the sale of an article of personal property which was acquired by the seller as a trade-in to the extent that the 20250HB1582PN1886 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 gross receipts in the sale of the article taken in trade does not exceed the amount of trade-in allowance made in acquiring such article; (iv) refunds, credits or allowances given to a purchaser on account of defects in goods sold or merchandise returned; (v) Pennsylvania sales tax; (vi) based on the value of exchanges or transfers between one seller and another seller who transfers property with the understanding that property of an identical description will be returned at a subsequent date; however, when sellers engaged in similar lines of business exchange property and one of them makes payment to the other in addition to the property exchanged, the additional payment received may be included in the gross receipts of the seller receiving such additional cash payments; (vii) of sellers from sales to other sellers in the same line where the seller transfers the title or possession at the same price for which the seller acquired the merchandise; or (viii) transfers between one department, branch or division of a corporation or other business entity of goods, wares and merchandise to another department, branch or division of the same corporation or business entity and which are recorded on the books to reflect such interdepartmental transactions.]* * *Section 303. Payroll Tax.--* * *(d) A city of the second class may enact ordinances and regulations necessary to implement this section. [The ordinance levying the tax authorized by this section shall permanently replace the city's existing mercantile tax and shall reduce the business privilege tax rate as follows:(1) In tax years 2005 and 2006, the business privilege tax shall be two mills.20250HB1582PN1886 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) In tax years 2007, 2008 and 2009, the business privilege tax shall be one mill unless the revenues collected from the payroll expense tax exceed fifty million five hundred thousand dollars ($50,500,000) in any fiscal year, at which time the business privilege tax shall be replaced for the subsequent fiscal year. After the phaseout of the business privilege tax, all amounts of moneys in excess of fifty million five hundred thousand dollars ($50,500,000) shall be used by the city of the second class to further accelerate the reduction of the tax imposed by the city of the second class on parking as provided in section 308.(3) In tax year 2010 and thereafter, the business privilege tax may not be imposed.]* * *Section 311. Limitations on Rates of Specific Taxes.--No taxes levied under the provisions of this chapter shall be levied by any political subdivision on the following subjects exceeding the rates specified in this section:* * *[(2) On each dollar of the whole volume of business transacted by wholesale dealers in goods, wares and merchandise, one mill, by retail dealers in goods, wares and merchandise and by proprietors of restaurants or other places where food, drink and refreshments are served, one and one-half mills; except in cities of the second class, where rates shall not exceed one mill on wholesale dealers and two mills on retail dealers and proprietors. No such tax shall be levied on the dollar volume of business transacted by wholesale and retail dealers derived from the resale of goods, wares and merchandise, taken by any dealer as a trade-in or as part payment for other goods, wares and 20250HB1582PN1886 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 merchandise, except to the extent that the resale price exceeds the trade-in allowance. When a political subdivision which currently levies, assesses or collects a mercantile or business privilege tax on gross receipts under section 533 of the act of December 13, 1988 (P.L.1121, No.145), known as the "Local Tax Reform Act," merges with one or more political subdivisions to form a new political subdivision on or after August 1, 2008, the new political subdivision may levy that mercantile or business privilege tax in the first year following the merger at a rate necessary to generate the same revenues generated in the last fiscal year that the merging political subdivision generated before the merger. Such rate shall remain in effect for the new political subdivision in subsequent years, but the revenue-neutral limitation shall only apply to the first year following the merger. If the merging political subdivision had previously shared the rate of taxation with another political subdivision, the nonmerging political subdivision which had shared the rate is capped at the rate it was previously levying.]* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 331. Expiration of Business Gross Receipts Tax.--(a) All mercantile, business privilege and other business gross receipts taxes authorized under this chapter and in accordance with section 311 shall expire December 31, 2025.(b) A political subdivision may not levy, assess or collect a tax referred to under subsection (a) after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of section 331 of the act.This section.20250HB1582PN1886 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The remainder of this act shall take effect December 31, 2026.20250HB1582PN1886 - 6 - 12